Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,185
Dissolution by board of directors
and shareholders.

(MBCA
14.02) (a) A corporation's board of directors may propose dissolution for
submission to the shareholders.

(b) For a proposal to dissolve
to be adopted:

(1)
The board of directors must recommend dissolution to the shareholders unless
(i) the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest
or other special circumstances it should make no recommendation or (ii) section
21-2,101 applies. If either subdivision (1)(i) or (ii) of this subsection
applies, it must communicate the basis for so proceeding; and

(2) The shareholders entitled
to vote must approve the proposal to dissolve as provided in subsection (e)
of this section.

(c)
The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposal for dissolution
on any basis.

(d)
The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to
vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting. The notice must also state that
the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider dissolving
the corporation.

(e)
Unless the articles of incorporation or the board of directors acting pursuant
to subsection (c) of this section require a greater vote, a greater number
of shares to be present, or a vote by voting groups, adoption of the proposal
to dissolve shall require the approval of the shareholders at a meeting at
which a quorum consisting of at least a majority of the votes entitled to
be cast exists.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 185.